Utah statutes.
73-18-13.1.   Accident involving property damage -- Duties of operator, occupant, and owner -- Penalties.

(1)  As used in this section, "reason to believe" means information from which a reasonable person would believe that the person may have been involved in an accident.

(2) (a)  The operator of a vessel who has reason to believe that the operator may have been involved in an accident resulting only in damage to another vessel or other property shall remain at the scene of the accident until the operator has fulfilled the requirements of Section 73-18-13.

(b)  If the operator has reason to believe that the operator may have been involved in an accident resulting in damage to another vessel or other property only after leaving the scene of the accident, the operator shall immediately comply as nearly as possible with the requirements of Section 73-18-13.

(3)  A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

